Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 13 Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets

Editor’s notes.

Former Chapter 13, consisting
of Code Sections 53-13-1 to 53-13-34 (Article 1), 53-13-50 to 53-13-85 (Article 2), 53-13-100 to 53-13-104 (Part 1 of Article 3), and 53-13-120 to 53-13-126 (Part 2 of Article 3), was repealed by Ga. L. 1991, p. 810, § 1, effective July 1, 1991, and was based on Ga. L. 1901, p. 57, § 1; Ga. L. 1908, p. 72, § 10; Civil Code 1910, §§ 462, 3765; Ga. L. 1918, p. 234, § 2; Ga. L. 1919, p. 384, § 2; Code 1933, §§ 49-218, 108-305, 108-420; Ga. L. 1939, p. 366, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 178, §§ 2, 5; Ga. L. 1959, p. 175, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 232, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1474, § 7; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 53; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 53; Ga. L. 1989, p. 364, § 4.
For present law on trustees, see Chapter 12 of Title 53.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 enactment of this chapter, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 204 (2018).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (2018).